Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
Subchapter 7
— Provisions Applicable to Particular Employees

Effective Dates.

Acts 1961, No. 14, § 2: Jan. 30, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “The legislature having determined that the appointment of a law clerk for counties with population of 240,000 or litigation in the circuit courts of said counties an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1963, No. 478, § 2: Mar. 19, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that all persons eligible to receive benefits under Act 202 of 1961 were not aware of said act, or did not apply for coverage under said act within sufficient time to qualify for benefits thereunder; that the time for applying for benefits under said act expired on January 1, 1962 and such persons are now barred from obtaining the benefits of said act; and, that only by the immediate passage of this act may additional time be granted for applying for the benefits of said act, thereby removing a gross injustice to those persons who are now barred from coverage under said act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 522, § 4: Mar. 19, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to include and cover disabled former members of the General Assembly in the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, who have become disabled prior to their sixty-fifth birthday, the immediate passage of this Act is necessary; now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1965 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 10: Nov. 6, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that clarification of the potential retirement status of certain state employees is needed and because of the lack of such clarification many employees may be deprived of retirement benefits and that only by the immediate passage of this Act can such situation be corrected. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 66, §§ 2, 4: Became law without Governor's signature, effective retroactive to Jan. 1, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present requirement that the law clerk of the circuit court be a licensed attorney renders it difficult if not almost impossible to employ a person to fill said position; that the present law prescribing qualifications for the law clerks of the Arkansas Supreme Court require only that the law clerks be licensed attorneys or graduates of approved law schools; that the qualifications of law clerks for circuit courts should be the same as but no greater than those for Supreme Court Clerks; and, that this Act is immediately necessary to revise the qualifications of circuit court law clerks to conform to the qualifications of Supreme Court law clerks and to make it possible to employ persons to fill the position of circuit court law clerk and thereby to further the administration of justice. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 14, § 3: Jan. 30, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found, and is hereby declared by the General Assembly that the Legislative Subdivision of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System is approaching financial insolvency; and only by the immediate operation of this Act may these conditions be alleviated. Therefore, an emergency hereby is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 125, § 8: Feb. 25, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the employees of the War Memorial Stadium Commission have been ineligible for membership in the Retirement System and that such employees are employees of the State and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable such employees to become members of the System and to pay such necessary contributions therefor. Now therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 184, § 9: Became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 28, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the employees of the Arkansas Real Estate Commission, or its successor, have been ineligible for membership in the Retirement System and that such employees are immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable such employees to become members of the System and to pay such necessary contributions therefor and to establish the number of officials and employees and their rates of pay. Now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 85, § 5: Feb. 12, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is presently no specific provision for survivor benefits for surviving spouses of members of the General Assembly who die during their service as a member of the General Assembly; that some members of the General Assembly have served many years and have contributed to the retirement system since its establishment, and that this act should be given immediate effect in order to provide survivor benefits for surviving spouses of members of the General Assembly who have served at least ten (10) years as a member of the General Assembly and whose surviving spouses are not presently entitled to any survivors benefits under the retirement system for members of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 103, § 8: Feb. 17, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to provide for an orderly retirement for public employees in Arkansas and for the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees Retirement System to have ample time for the implementation of the provisions of this act, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 271, § 3: Mar. 12, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of Act 103 of 1971 provides retirement benefits for members of the Arkansas General Assembly and the Constitutional Officers, but that certain members of the General Assembly who have served a portion of at least five (5) terms, or in excess of eight (8) years in the Arkansas General Assembly were not covered by the provisions of said Act, and that in order to remove this inequity, it is essential that legislation be enacted to cover such members of the General Assembly and that such legislation be given effect as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 305, § 7: Mar. 16, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 103 of 1971 provided benefits for retired members of the General Assembly and State Elected Constitutional Officers, but that clarification for eligibility of said benefits is essential for the proper administration of said Act, and to enable those persons who are eligible for benefits thereunder to obtain said benefits without undue delay. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 447, § 5: Mar. 23, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Public Employees Retirement System Law does not currently make adequate provision for the retirement of Governors of the State of Arkansas, and that this Act is immediately necessary to correct this inequitable situation by providing adequate benefits for such persons, and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 556, § 4: Apr. 2, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that persons who have spent many years in the employment of privately owned, semi-public waterworks systems, and who continue as employees of the system when the same is subsequently acquired by a municipality and operated as a municipal system should be permitted to obtain prior service credit in the State Employees Retirement System Municipal Division for their services as an employee of the system prior to its becoming a municipal system and that this Act is immediately necessary to permit such employees to obtain such prior service credit. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 666, § 14: Apr. 10, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act change the rate of contributions, change the value of service credits and establish new types of benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable persons to receive proper benefits thereunder without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 754, § 5: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 103 of 1971 provided benefits for retired members of the General Assembly and State elected constitutional officers, and that Act 85 of 1971 provided benefits for the surviving spouse of a member of the General Assembly or a state elected constitutional officer, but that clarification of said benefits is essential for the proper administration of said acts, and to enable those persons who are eligible for benefits thereunder to obtain said benefits without undue delay. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 313, § 4: Mar. 4, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law relating to survivor benefits for the spouse of a deceased member of the General Assembly or a deceased State elected constitutional officer provides for only a portion of the benefits to which the deceased member would have been entitled; that the survivor benefits provided for such spouses under the present law are totally inadequate and should be increased immediately, and that this Act is designed to provide for such increase in survivor benefits and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 907, § 22: Apr. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this Act clarify coverage, service credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 234, § 7: Feb. 23, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 110 of 1967 specifically authorized full-time employees of drainage improvement districts in this State to elect to participate in the Public Employees Retirement System but that due to a restrictive interpretation of that Act, those employees who failed to make the election to participate in the System on or before July 1, 1967, were precluded from joining the System; that employees of many drainage improvement districts in the State were not made aware of the provisions of Act 110 of 1967 prior to July 1, 1967, and therefore did not have an opportunity to elect to participate in the Retirement System; that such employees are not now eligible for membership in any adequate public supported retirement system and that this Act should be given effect at the earliest possible date to enable such employees to participate in the Public Employees Retirement System if they so elect. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 934, § 3: Mar. 31, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that retired members of the Public Employees Retirement System are authorized to earn limited income from a public employer, within the limitations established by the Federal Social Security Act for eligibility to receive Social Security benefits, but that said authority does not apply to retired elected county officials who are prohibited from receiving any income from employment in any full-time or part-time position in a county elected constitutional office; that it is inequitable to deny retired county elected constitutional officers opportunities which are available to other members of the Public Employees Retirement System to earn limited income without jeopardizing their retirement benefits; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 211, § 9: Feb. 23, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration of justice in the Sixth Circuit-Chancery Circuit that this Act be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 715, § 9: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Public Retirement laws need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the systems and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 412, § 3: Mar. 11, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law is unclear regarding the crediting of service in the Public Employees Retirement System for members of the General Assembly who die during a term of office; that it is necessary to the proper administration of the Public Employees Retirement System that the law relating to this matter be clarified at the earliest possible date and that this Act is designed to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 491, § 3: Mar. 16, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law is unclear regarding the crediting of service in the Public Employees Retirement System for state constitutional officers and members of the General Assembly who die during a term of office; that it is necessary to the proper administration of the Public Employees Retirement System that the law relating to this matter be clarified at the earliest possible date and that this Act is designed to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 859, § 19: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the system and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 187, § 11: Mar. 12, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a reduction in work force caused by budgetary constraints may be avoided by offering early retirement incentives; that to offer early retirement incentives and to avoid unnecessary layoffs this Act should take effect immediately upon its passage. Therefore, an emergency is declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 461, § 5: Mar. 30, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current retirement law defining employee is unclear; that such should be revised to specifically include prosecuting attorneys of judicial districts; that the purchase of service credit should be expanded for certain employees; that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to preserve the public health, welfare, and safety. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 717, § 5: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a reduction in county work forces called for by budgetary constraints may be avoided by offering early retirement and to avoid unnecessary layoffs, this Act should take effect immediately upon its passage; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to accomplish said purpose, thereby assuring members of the County Division of the Public Employees Retirement System a more equitable method of computing retirement benefits. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and welfare, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 808, § 3: Apr. 8, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the General Assembly that certain inequities to state employees would result from the enactment of Act 187 of 1987; that this Act is necessary to correct such inequities. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1004, § 3: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1206 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 944, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the only unelected position covered under the Judicial Retirement System is the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, that this position should be covered under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, and that it is necessary for the proper administration of justice in Arkansas to provide this transfer shall be effective on July 1, 1993. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 398, § 9: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1995, is essential to the operation of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 1292, § 9: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that employees of Rural Waterworks Facilities Boards created by Act 617 of 1995 should be entitled to participate in the Public Employees Retirement System at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted this act might not become effective until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 76, § 10: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Intergovernmental Juvenile Detention Council of the Tenth Judicial District created by uncodified Act 899 of 1995 should be entitled to participate in the Public Employees Retirement System at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted this act might not become effective until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be effective from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 299, § 28: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of law governing the Public Employees' Retirement System need clarification, standardization, and repeal and that the effective administration of State government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration of State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 325, § 17: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that certain provisions of the law governing the Public Employees Retirement System need to be amended concerning eligibility, death benefits, and disability benefits, and that the effective administration of state government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2005, No. 1021, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 177, § 15: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this bill affects the structure of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System and the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the ideal time to make revisions to the retirement systems is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 1242, §
6: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Arkansas State Police has had ongoing financial difficulty for over twelve (12) years; that the State Police Retirement System has sustained investment losses of approximately one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) within the last two (2) years; that a larger investment pool is needed to help reduce risk and enhance returns; that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System has the size and expertise to effectively reduce the volatility of returns, enhance relative returns, and best protect the State Police Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect the members and beneficiaries of the State Police Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2013, No. 332, § 13: Mar. 14, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is vital that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System be permitted to immediately implement policies regarding the termination of employment, eligibility of employees to receive benefits, availability of information, and when to pay interest on employee contributions; and to clarify the meaning of terms in the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated to avoid the undue consumption of the system's resources. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 337, § 6: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that statutes concerning the Arkansas public retirement plans are in need of revision to maintain the public retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the state operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; and that this act is necessary to ensure provisions of this act are effective at the beginning of the fiscal year for ease of administration and operation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2017, No. 269, § 13: Feb. 22, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Parks and Tourism is well-positioned to oversee and promote War Memorial Stadium; that the transfer of War Memorial Stadium to the Department of Parks and Tourism promotes efficiency; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to ensure a timely transition to minimize any adverse impact on upcoming events to be held at War Memorial Stadium. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-4-701 — 24-4-703. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning service by members of the General Assembly before 1959, were repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. They were derived from the following sources:

24-4-701. Acts 1961, No. 202, §§ 1, 2; 1963, No. 478, § 1; 1967, No. 402, § 1; 1969, No. 14, § 1; 1969, No. 202, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2510.2, 12-2510.3.

24-4-702. Acts 1973, No. 396, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.7.

24-4-703. Acts 1963, No. 522, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.9.

24-4-704 — 24-4-707. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning service credit of members of the General Assembly between 1957 and 1967, were repealed by Acts 2019, No. 448, §§ 3-6, effective March 13, 2019. The sections were derived from the following sources:

24-4-704. Acts 1975, No. 313, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.10; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 34.

24-4-705. Acts 1971, No. 103, § 4; 1971, No. 305, § 1; 1973, No. 396, § 1; 1973, No. 665, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.6; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 35.

24-4-706. Acts 1971, No. 103, § 5; 1971, No. 305, § 2; 1973, No. 254, § 1; 1973, No. 666, § 1; 1975, No. 907, § 9; 1979, No. 715, § 5; 1981, No. 859, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.1; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 36; 2003, No. 1473, § 56.

24-4-707. Acts 1961, No. 193, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.1; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 37.

24-4-708, 24-4-709. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning service of members of the house of representatives, were repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. They were derived from the following sources:

24-4-708. Acts 1971, No. 271, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.5.

24-4-709. Acts 1973, No. 397, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.8.

24-4-710. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning contributory credited service for General Assembly members and state constitutional officers dying in office and surviving spouse benefits, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 448, § 7, effective March 13, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 412, § 1; 1981, No. 491, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2580; Acts 1999, No. 627, § 3; 2001, No. 151, § 38.

24-4-711. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning survivor benefits for spouses of General Assembly members and state constitutional officers dying in office, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 85, §§ 1, 2; 1971, No. 305, § 4; 1973, No. 396, § 2; 1973, No. 754, § 2; 1975, No. 313, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2510.12, 12-2510.13; Acts 1991, No. 463, §§ 2, 3.

24-4-712. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning contributory service accumulated by the Governor, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 448, § 8, effective March 13, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 447, §§ 1-3; 1975, No. 286, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-319 — 12-321; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 39.

24-4-713. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Secretary to Lieutenant Governor, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 580, §§ 1, 2.

24-4-714. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning contributory service accrued by constitutional officers, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 448, § 9, effective March 13, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 103, § 6; 1971, No. 305, § 3; 1973, No. 754, § 1; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1206, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.2; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1004, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 40.

24-4-715 — 24-4-722. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning prior service credit for county constitutional officers, elected county clerks, General Assembly employees, certain employees of House of Representatives, employees of state boards, commissions, etc., superintendents of state eleemosynary institutions, and certain employees of department of health, were repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. They were derived from the following sources:

24-4-715. Acts 1977, No. 721, § 3; 1979, No. 533, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.19; Acts 1987, No. 43, § 1.

24-4-716. Acts 1977, No. 934, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.18.

24-4-717. Acts 1969, No. 200, § 1; 1985, No. 938, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.4.

24-4-718. Acts 1965, No. 109, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2522.2, 12-2522.3.

24-4-719. Acts 1985, No. 19, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2584.

24-4-720. Acts 1973, No. 187, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2549.2.

24-4-721. Acts 1963, No. 96, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2522.1.

24-4-722. Acts 1983, No. 915, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2583, 12-2583.1.